lexd/ru_lemmas/0_rules.lexd
PATTERNS
RuLemmasV RuLemmasTags*
RuLemmasN RuLemmasTags*
RuLemmasAdj RuLemmasTags*
RuLemmasPron RuLemmasTags*

LEXICON RuLemmasTags
>:>
<1pl>:<1pl>
<1sg>:<1sg>
<2pl>:<2pl>
<2sg>:<2sg>
<3pl>:<3pl>
<3sg>:<3sg>
<add>:<add>
<cont2>:<cont2>
<dat>:<dat>
<dim>:<dim>
<dir>:<dir>
<f>:<f>
<fut>:<fut>
<hon>:<hon>
<imp>:<imp>
<lat>:<lat>
<loc>:<loc>
<m>:<m>
<neg>:<neg>
<nom>:<nom>
<num>:<num>
<obl>:<obl>
<ord>:<ord>
<pl>:<pl>
<prep>:<prep>
<prf>:<prf>
<prs>:<prs>
<pst>:<pst>
<refl>:<refl>
<self>:<self>
<sup>:<sup>
